Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Assessments and Bonds Generally
§ 15-6-433.
Bonds; action for nonpayment.

If the city or town fails, neglects or refuses to pay the bonds or to promptly collect any assessment when due, the owner of any bonds may proceed in his own name to collect the assessments and foreclose the lien in any court of competent jurisdiction. The bondholder shall recover five percent (5%) in addition to the amount and interest thereon, together with the cost of the suit. Any number of holders of the bonds for any single improvement may join as plaintiffs, and any number of owners of property encumbered by the lien may be joined as defendants in the suit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 378; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-378; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-434

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “property encumbered by the lien” for “the property on which they are a lien.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Action need not be class action. —

This section does not require that an action brought under it must be a class action, that is to say, an action for the benefit of all unpaid bonds, nor does it state that an action brought by anyone who has the right to foreclose must be brought primarily for the benefit of the holder of the earlier numbered bonds. Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951).

City not liable for failure to collect assessments. —

City may by general ordinance provide for the enforcement of assessments and a sale of the property subject thereto, but it is not obligatory upon it to do so, nor is it obligatory upon the city to collect the assessments, and if it fails, neglects, or refuses to pay the bonds or promptly to collect any assessments when due, owner of the bonds may do so. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

In tort action against city for failure to perform its alleged duties in collecting and applying special assessments to the payment of special improvement bonds, city was not liable as the bonds contained the statutory limitation of liability, and also gave the holders the right to enforce the assessments, no duty being imposed upon city to collect and apply the special assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

Time limitation. —

The right of action created by this section must be brought within the time fixed by §

15-6-426

.Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951).

Effect of ordering city to accept bonds and cancel assessments.—

Where owner of local improvement bonds had brought action to enforce payment of bonds and city, pursuant to court order, accepted bonds and cancelled assessments, an owner of similar bonds carrying lower numbers could not recover payment of latter bonds from city on basis that city became liable when it had accepted bonds of higher numbers and cancelled assessments, where no money was actually collected by the city. Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951).

§ 15-6-434.
Bonds; remedy for nonpayment.

No holder or owner of any bond issued under this chapter has any claim against the city or town, except from the special assessment made for the improvement for which the bond was issued, or from the local improvement fund of the city or town. His remedy in case of nonpayment is limited to the enforcement of the assessments, or for payment out of the local improvement fund. A copy of this section shall be plainly written, printed or engraved on each bond issued.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 379; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-379; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-435

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

See notes to §

15-6-437

.

Municipality is not compelled to enforce special assessments

for the payment of local improvement bonds under this section and §

15-6-433

. It follows that it is not compelled to intervene in any action in order to do so. Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951).

Nor liable in tort for failure to enforce assessments. —

City is not liable in tort for its failure to make any effort to collect special assessments levied to pay special improvement bonds, as statute gives bondholder the right to collect such assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

In tort action against city for failure to perform its alleged duties in collecting and applying special assessments to the payment of special improvement bonds, city was not liable as the bonds contained the statutory limitation of liability, and also gave the holders the right to enforce the assessments, no duty being imposed upon city to collect and apply the special assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

If city and its officials fulfill their duty in connection with special assessments, nothing further can be expected of them; the contract between the parties, or the statute limiting liability, must then govern, and city is relieved from any liability even though there be a deficiency in the amount collectible. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

But liable for failure to make assessments. —

When municipality has power to make local improvements and pay therefor out of its general fund or by assessments against abutting property, and takes the latter course, but neglects or refuses unreasonably to make valid assessments by reason of which certificates or bonds issued in payment are rendered valueless, municipality must respond in damages, even though it is agreed between the parties that they shall be paid out of assessments. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

And liable on bonds if assessments are invalid. —

Where holder of local improvement bonds brought suit against abutting property owners to enforce special assessments, and called upon the city to become a party to that action, which was refused, the assessments being invalid, he was not obliged to bring mandamus to compel city officials to reassess, but was entitled to personal judgment against city for the sum due on the bonds. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Payment from local improvement fund mandatory only if fundcreated. —

Although this section is mandatory in terms, giving the impression that it is necessary to create a local improvement fund, insertion in bonds of the clause relating to payment out of such fund is mandatory only in cases in which the revolving fund has in fact been created, since by §

15-6-437

creation of the fund is made permissive. Abel v. Gillette, 72 Wyo. 366, 265 P.2d 376,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1954).

§ 15-6-435.
Bonds; payment of principal and interest; redemption call.

The city or town treasurer shall pay the principal and interest on bonds issued out of the respective local improvement funds from which they are payable. If there is sufficient money in any local improvement fund over the amount required for the payment of maturing principal and interest to pay the principal of one (1) or more bonds, which are subject to redemption on the next interest payment date, the treasurer shall call in and pay those bonds in numerical order. Notice of the call shall be made by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, or by mail to the holder, if known, not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date of call and shall state that bonds no.
. . . . .
(giving the serial number or numbers of the bonds called) will be paid on the call day, and interest on those bonds shall cease upon that date.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 380; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-380; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-436

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1, ch. 48, § 1.

When bonds must be paid in numerical order. —

This section requires the payment of bonds in numerical order when called by reason of proper funds on hand in the treasury of the city. It makes no provision for any other case. Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951).

§ 15-6-436.
Bonds; indebtedness.

The indebtedness created by the issuance of any warrants or bonds provided in this chapter is not within the limitation of indebtedness of any city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 381; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-381; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-437

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-437.
Bonds; revolving fund authorized; source of monies; limitation.

If the governing body determines that improvements constructed in any local improvement district confer general benefits on the city or town, it may create concurrently a fund to be known as the revolving local improvement fund. In payment for those benefits and to meet the financial requirements of the revolving fund, the city or town shall advance annually to the credit of the fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes collected or received by it, a sum of not less than two percent (2%) of the total amount of the bonds issued for the local improvement district for a period of ten (10) years or for the length of time necessary to pay all bonds issued, whichever is the shorter. The fund shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the outstanding bond obligations of the district.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 382; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-382; W.S. 1977,

15-6-438

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Constitutionality generally. —

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., providing that no person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const., providing for just compensation for property taken. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Under this section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

plaintiff taxpayer is not deprived of any property but on the contrary he has been given property by reason of the fact that he is relieved of a burden which might have been imposed upon him and the public at large, but which instead is imposed upon certain property which is specially assessed. These sections do not violate art. 1, §§ 6, 32 and 33, Wyo. Const.Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 1, § 32, Wyo. Const., limiting right of eminent domain. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Use of taxes constitutional. —

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate the constitutional amendment of 1954, which added art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., prohibiting moneys derived from state excise or license taxes on vehicles or fuels from being expended for other than cost of administering such laws, highway and street costs, construction, maintenance, etc. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Contention that storm sewers could not be constructed in cities from moneys supplied by gasoline taxes through revolving local improvement fund because of constitutional amendment, art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., prohibiting moneys derived from excise taxes on vehicles or fuel from being used for other than “cost for construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of … streets …,” etc., was overruled, since storm sewers are an incidental part of improving streets. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Constitutional debt provisions not violated. —

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const., providing that no debt in excess of taxes for the current year shall be created by any county or city unless that proposition shall have been submitted to a vote of, and approved by, the people thereof. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const., providing that no city shall create any indebtedness exceeding 2% on assessed value of taxable property therein as shown by last preceding general assessment. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Fund is a guaranty fund for the payment of bonds, issued in connection with local improvements and not a general obligation of the city, and is taken out of the cigarette tax and gasoline tax which comes into the general fund of the city. Diverting these taxes to guarantee payment of bonds does not create indebtedness against city in violation of art. 16, §§ 4 and 5, Wyo. Const.Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Fund is not a loan in the ordinary sense

but is merely a small contribution to a liability which is shifted from the public onto the shoulders of particular persons and does not violate art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

This section and §§

15-6-434

and

15-6-438

do not violate art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const., providing that the state, a county or city, shall not loan or give its credit to any individual, association or corporation. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

The fund is for a public purpose. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Section conferred a new power upon cities and towns;

it was intended to repair to some extent the unsavory reputation which local improvement bonds had attained in Wyoming, so the supreme court should construe the legislation liberally in that light. Abel v. Gillette, 72 Wyo. 366, 265 P.2d 376,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1954).

Where section was not yet effective, town lacked power

to create revolving fund since it could not act in anticipation of a power it would later possess. Bonds issued or to be issued in connection with the local improvement district would be invalid insofar as purporting to be payable out of such a fund. But bonds were valid insofar as they referred to and were payable from special assessments from the district. Abel v. Gillette, 72 Wyo. 366, 265 P.2d 376,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1954).

City or town council is not compelled to create such a fund

as is provided by section. Creation is permissive only. Abel v. Gillette, 72 Wyo. 366, 265 P.2d 376,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1954).

Time for creation of revolving fund not intended to be of essence.—

Creation of the fund need not necessarily be concurrent with establishment of the local improvement district but may be subsequent. Abel v. Gillette, 72 Wyo. 366, 265 P.2d 376,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1954).

Fund may be created from any or all of taxes mentioned. —

Section provides that the fund should be created out of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes and is in the disjunctive. City may create fund out of any one of three taxes, or out of all of them, in its discretion and need not designate specifically from which it intends to create fund. Important point of section is creation of revolving fund, not specific tax out of three mentioned. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

And may equal 20% of original amount of bonds. —

Under this section and §

15-6-438

it is contemplated that 20% of original amount of bonds issued may be paid into revolving fund and procedure of city in so doing, with privilege of withdrawal, does not violate spirit of these sections even though balance in fund may exceed 20% of amount of bonds outstanding at a given time. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

No withdrawals until bonds are paid. —

This section and §

15-6-438

do not seem to contemplate any withdrawals of amounts once paid into the revolving fund until all the bonds are paid. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Law reviews. —

For a note, “Municipal Assistance to an Improvement District,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 180 (1957).

§ 15-6-438.
Bonds; transfer to and between funds.

The city or town shall withdraw annually from the revolving fund and deposit in the local improvement district fund sufficient money to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Delinquent assessments shall remain liens upon the property assessed, and if they are enforced or foreclosed, the proceeds of the sales or other payments discharging the delinquencies shall revert to the revolving fund in repayment of the amounts advanced. If there is money in the local improvement fund which is not required for the payment of any bond or interest of the local improvement fund, and after all bonds and interest have been fully paid, the money remaining in the local improvement fund, by order of the governing body, shall be transferred to the revolving fund for disposition as the governing body may determine.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 383; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-383; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-439

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Constitutionality and construction of section. —

See notes to §

15-6-437

.

§ 15-6-439.
Payment of assessments; redemption from liability; notice; bonds; use of sums.

The owner of any lot, tract or parcel of land or other property charged with any assessments may redeem it from all or any portion of the liability for the contract price of the improvement by paying the entire assessment or any portion thereof charged against the lot or parcel of land, without interest, within thirty (30) days after notice to him of the assessment unless the legal owners of record of all of the property assessed in the district have waived this thirty (30) day period. Unless the legal owners of record of all property assessed in the district waive the thirty (30) day cash payment period, the city or town treasurer, as soon as the assessment roll has been placed in his hands for collection, shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town. The notice shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks and shall specify that the roll is in his hands for collection and that any assessment thereon or any portion of any assessment may be paid at any time within thirty (30) days from the date of the first publication of the notice without penalty, interest or costs. Bonds may be issued prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) day period but only if the legal owners of all of the property assessed in the district have waived the thirty (30) day cash payment period, and bonds may be issued at any time after the expiration of the thirty (30) day period. The governing body may provide that the owner of any lot or parcel of land may redeem it from all liability for the unpaid amount of the assessment at any time after the thirty (30) days, if applicable, by paying all the installments of the assessment remaining unpaid, with interest thereon to the date of the maturity of the installment next falling due. If any sum is paid as provided in this section, it shall be paid to the city treasurer, or to the officer whose duty it is to collect the assessments, and all sums so paid shall be applied solely to the payment of the cost and expense of the improvements or to the redemption of the bonds issued.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 384; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-384; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-440

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 154, § 1.

§ 15-6-440.
Payment of assessments; installment collection.

Unless the assessment against any parcel is paid within thirty (30) days after the notice, or the thirty (30) day period has been waived by the legal owners of record of all of the property assessed in the district, the assessment shall be collected in installments as provided in W.S.

15-6-409

and

15-6-432

. Each installment is delinquent unless paid when due.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 385; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-385; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-441

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 154, § 2.

§ 15-6-441.
Assessments and contracts; when valid and enforceable.

If the governing body has made any contract for any local improvement or makes any assessment against property within any local improvement district and has in making the contract or assessment acted in good faith and without fraud, the contract and assessment is valid and enforceable, and the assessment is a lien upon the property involved.

No objection to the validity of the contract or assessment may be made on the ground that:

The contract for the improvement was not awarded in the manner or at the time required by law;

The assessment was made by an unauthorized officer or person, if it has been confirmed by the governing body;

The contract or assessment is based upon a front foot basis or upon a basis of benefits to the property within the district, unless it appears that the city or town authorities acted fraudulently or oppressively in making the assessment.

All assessments made by the city or town authorities in good faith are valid, in full force and effect and collectible in the manner provided by law for the collection of assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 386; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-386; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-442

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-442.
Right of paying joint owner to contribution; lien created.

If any local assessment or installment thereof is paid, or any certificate of sale redeemed, or any judgment paid by any joint owner of any property assessed for any local improvement, the joint owner, after demand and refusal, by an action brought in the district court, may recover from each of his coowners the amounts of the payment which each coowner should bear, with interest thereon at ten percent (10%) per year from the date of the payments, and the costs of the action. The joint owner making payment has a lien upon the undivided interest of his coowners in the property from date of payment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 387; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-387; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-443

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-443.
When paid assessment recoverable.

If any person through error or inadvertence pays any local assessment, or installment thereof, upon the lands of another, the payor, after demand and refusal, by an action in the district court, may recover from the owner of the lands the amount paid and costs of the action.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 388; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-388; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-444

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-444.
Correction of mistakes; payment of contractor.

The governing body, by any subsequent proceedings, shall correct any mistakes, errors or irregularities in any of the proceedings mentioned in this chapter.

After any local improvements have been commenced, the city or town engineer shall prepare an estimate of the work done each month. The governing body shall order the recorder to draw a negotiable warrant in favor of the contractor upon the special assessment fund for an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the monthly estimate. The remaining ten percent (10%) shall be paid to the contractor upon completion and acceptance of the work. The warrants, payable only out of the special assessment fund, shall bear interest at the rate allowed on public warrants pursuant to W.S.

9-4-106

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 389; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-389; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-445

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 15-6-445.
Governing body; hearing continuance; jurisdiction retained.

The governing body may continue the hearing upon any petition, resolution or remonstrance provided for in this chapter and shall retain jurisdiction until it is fully disposed of.

The governing body does not lose jurisdiction over the making of any improvements, the making of any assessment or the issuance of any bonds or any other matter provided for in this chapter by reason of any adjournment, delay, error or irregularity on the part of any member or any city or town officer.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 390; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-390; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-446

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-446.
Extra work; performance; cost; payment.

Extra work in connection with any local improvements not particularly provided for in the plans, specifications, estimates, bids and contracts shall be performed by the contractor at the direction of the city engineer at a cost of labor and materials plus fifteen percent (15%) for superintendence. The amount shall be included in the assessment for the improvement or be paid out of the general or road funds of the city or town in the discretion of the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 391; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-391; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-447

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-447.
Property description; proportional payment; notice to purchasers.

It is sufficient in any case to describe the lot or piece of ground as it is platted or recorded, or described in any official record, although it belongs to several persons. The owner of any part may pay his proportion of the tax as determined by the city treasurer. Any purchaser, assignee or transferee of any property subject to assessment in any improvement district, after the publication of the notice of intention to create the improvement district, is held to notice thereof and of all proceedings with reference thereto the same as owners of the property at the time of the notice or proceedings.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 392; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-392; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-448

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-448.
Work on railways and streets along railways.

All railway and street railway companies shall make or reconstruct all or those portions of all paving, graveling or macadamizing between the rails of their tracks and one (1) foot outside thereof at their own expense as the city or town may require. The improvement or the reconstruction shall be of the material and character ordered by the city or town and shall be done at the same time that the rest of the improvement is made or reconstructed. No work on the improvement along the railway or street railway may be permitted to delay or interfere with the work of the general improvement of the street, and no use may be made of that portion of the railway or street railway, without the written permission of the city engineer, during the progress of the work or until the improvement is safe for use and open for traffic by the city engineer.

When the improvement is being constructed or reconstructed the companies shall lay, in the best approved manner, such rails as the governing body may require. The companies shall keep and maintain the paving, graveling and macadamizing between their rails and one (1) foot outside thereof and the rails up to the surface grade of the improved street, according to the plans and survey of the city therefor and all in good repair, using the same material as is used for the original improvement or such other material as the governing body may order. When the improvement of any street is being constructed or reconstructed the companies shall raise or lower their tracks and rails to conform to the grade established by the city or town for the improvement. If any railway or street railway company fails or refuses to comply with an order, resolution or ordinance of the governing body to make, reconstruct, maintain or repair an improvement, the work may be done by the city and the cost and expense thereof shall be assessed against the company and upon its real estate and personal property within the corporate limits of the city or town and the franchise granted to the company in the manner provided for the assessment of the cost against other property. The assessment may be collected in the manner provided for other assessments or in a direct proceeding in the district court. If the cost of any part of the improvement of any street is charged against any railway or street railway company or its property, plans and specifications for that part of the improvement shall be included in the plans and specifications filed by the city engineer for the improvement of the other portions of the street. The bids therefor shall be called for by the city or town in connection with the bids for the remainder of the improvement and received showing the cost per square yard separately from the cost per square yard of the other portions of the improvement. If done by the city or town, the cost shall be determined separately from the cost of the other portions of the improvement. At any time after the advertisement for bids for graveling, macadamizing or paving of any street or streets occupied by any railway or street railway, they shall file with the governing body a statement indicating whether they refuse to construct or reconstruct the improvement or whether they desire the city or town to do the improving and charge the cost against the company. The instrument shall be filed not more than three (3) days after the opening of the bids for the work, and if the instrument is not filed within that time, it is deemed a refusal to do the improving themselves and a request for the city or town to construct it and assess the cost to the company. Special improvement warrants or bonds may be issued for the construction or reconstruction or maintenance of an improvement, the cost of which is assessed to the company.

If any tracks or rails of any railway or street railway are laid or relaid upon any street or streets improved by paving, graveling or macadamizing, the company shall do the work under the supervision of the city engineer and in such a manner as to injure the improvement as little as possible and shall reconstruct those portions removed or injured by them so that the street is left in as good a condition as it was prior to commencing the laying or relaying of tracks or rails.

Railway or street railway companies as used in this section include the owner or owners of any railway or street railway whether persons or corporations.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 393; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-393; W.S. 1977, § 15-6-449; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.